Maryland, session 2025, HB0574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
28–102.
This title applies only in St. Mary’s County.
28–1606.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
BOARD MAY ISSUE TO AN INDIVIDUAL OR FOR THE USE OF A PERSON NOT MORE
THAN THREE CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR RESTAURANT LICENSES.
(2) THE LICENSES SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION ARE FOR SEPARATE PREMISES.
– 1 –

Ch. 840 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) ONLY ONE OF THE LICENSES SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY AUTHORIZE THE SALE OF ALCOHOL FOR OFF–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON
MAY NOT HAVE A DIRECT OR INDIRECT INTEREST IN MORE THAN THREE CLASS B
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR RESTAURANT LICENSES.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT HAVE A DIRECT OR INDIRECT INTEREST IN
MORE THAN ONE CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR RESTAURANT LICENSE IF THE
LICENSE THAT AUTHORIZES THE SALE OF ALCOHOL FOR OFF–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION.
(C) AN INDIRECT INTEREST IS PRESUMED TO EXIST BETWEEN ANY
COMBINATION OF PERSONS IF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS EXIST
BETWEEN THEM:
(1) A COMMON PARENT COMPANY;
(2) A FRANCHISE AGREEMENT;
(3) A LICENSING AGREEMENT;
(4) A CONCESSION AGREEMENT;
(5) DUAL MEMBERSHIP IN A CHAIN OF BUSINESSES COMMONLY
OWNED AND OPERATED;
(6) (I) A SHARING OF DIRECTORS, STOCKHOLDERS, PARTNERS, OR
MEMBERS; OR
(II) A SHARING OF DIRECTORS, STOCKHOLDERS, PARTNERS, OR
MEMBERS OF PARENTS OR SUBSIDIARIES;
(7) COMMON DIRECT OR INDIRECT SHARING OF PROFIT FROM THE
SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; OR
(8) A SHARING OF A COMMON TRADE NAME, TRADEMARK, LOGO, OR
THEME OR MODE OF OPERATION IDENTIFIABLE BY THE PUBLIC.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –